Utah statutes.
63A-1-105.5.   Rulemaking authority of executive director.
The executive director shall, upon the recommendation of the appropriate
division directors, make rules consistent with state and federal law, and in
accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act,
governing:
(1)  administrative services; and
(2)  the provision and use of administrative services furnished to state
agencies and institutions.
